Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116.943, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Information required. (a) deleted text begin On or before January 1, 2026deleted text end new text begin Beginning July 1, 2027new text end , a manufacturer of a product new text begin manufactured on or after that date that is new text end sold, offered for sale, or distributed in the state that contains intentionally added PFAS must submit to the commissioner information that includes: (1) a brief description of the product, including a universal product code (UPC), stock keeping unit (SKU), or other numeric code assigned to the product; (2) the purpose for which PFAS are used in the product, including in any product components; (3) the amount of each PFAS, identified by its chemical abstracts service registry number, in the product, reported as an exact quantity determined using commercially available analytical methods or as falling within a range approved for reporting purposes by the commissioner; (4) the name and address of the manufacturer and the name, address, and phone number of a contact person for the manufacturer; and (5) any additional information requested by the commissioner as necessary to implement the requirements of this section. (b) With the approval of the commissioner, a manufacturer may supply the information required in paragraph (a) for a category or type of product rather than for each individual product. (c) A manufacturer must submit the information required under this subdivision whenever a new product that contains intentionally added PFAS is sold, offered for sale, or distributed in the state and update and revise the information whenever there is significant change in the information or when requested to do so by the commissioner. (d) A person may not sell, offer for sale, or distribute for sale in the state a product containing intentionally added PFAS if the manufacturer has failed to provide the information required under this subdivision and the person has received notification under subdivision 4. new text begin (e) This subdivision does not apply to a product listed under subdivision 5, paragraph (f). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 116.943, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Prohibitions. (a) Beginning January 1, 2025, a person may not sell, offer for sale, or distribute for sale in this state the following products if the product contains intentionally added PFAS: (1) carpets or rugs; (2) cleaning products; (3) cookware; (4) cosmetics; (5) dental floss; (6) fabric treatments; (7) juvenile products; (8) menstruation products; (9) textile furnishings; (10) ski wax; or (11) upholstered furniture. (b) Paragraph (a) does not prohibit the sale, offer for sale, or distribution for sale of a product that contains intentionally added PFAS only in electronic components or internal components. (c) The commissioner may by rule identify additional products by category or use that may not be sold, offered for sale, or distributed for sale in this state if they contain intentionally added PFAS and designate effective dates. A prohibition adopted under this paragraph must be effective no earlier than January 1, 2025, and no later than January 1, 2032. The commissioner must prioritize the prohibition of the sale of product categories that, in the commissioner's judgment, are most likely to contaminate or harm the state's environment and natural resources if they contain intentionally added PFAS. (d) Beginning January 1, 2032, a person may not sell, offer for sale, or distribute for sale in this state any product that contains intentionally added PFAS, unless the commissioner has determined by rule that the use of PFAS in the product is a currently unavoidable usenew text begin or the product is listed under paragraph (f)new text end . The commissioner may specify specific products or product categories for which the commissioner has determined the use of PFAS is a currently unavoidable use. The commissioner may not determine that the use of PFAS in a product is a currently unavoidable use if the product is listed in paragraph (a). (e) The commissioner may not take action under paragraph (c) or (d) with respect to a pesticide, as defined under chapter 18B, a fertilizer, an agricultural liming material, a plant amendment, or a soil amendment as defined under chapter 18C, unless the commissioner of agriculture approves the action. new text begin (f) The use of PFAS in the following products is a currently unavoidable use of PFAS: new text end new text begin (1) cooling, heating, ventilation, air-conditioning, or refrigeration equipment that contains intentionally added PFAS or refrigerants listed as acceptable, acceptable subject to use conditions, or acceptable subject to narrowed use limits by the United States Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to the Significant New Alternatives Policy Program, Code of Federal Regulations, title 40, part 82, subpart G, and sold, offered for sale, or distributed for sale for the use for which the refrigerant is listed pursuant to that program; new text end new text begin (2) a veterinary product for use in or on animals, including diagnostic equipment or test kits and the veterinary product's components, and any product that is a veterinary medical device, drug, biologic, or parasiticide or that is otherwise used in a veterinary medical setting or in veterinary medical applications that are regulated by or under the jurisdiction of: new text end new text begin (i) the United States Food and Drug Administration; new text end new text begin (ii) the United States Department of Agriculture, pursuant to the federal Virus-Serum-Toxin Act; or new text end new text begin (iii) the United States Environmental Protection Agency, pursuant to the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, excluding any products approved by the United States Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to that law for aerial and land application; new text end new text begin (3) a product developed or manufactured for the purpose of public health, environmental, or water-quality testing; new text end new text begin (4) a product required to meet standards or requirements of the United States Department of Transportation, Federal Aviation Administration, the National Aeronautics and Space Administration, the United States Department of Defense, or the United States Department of Homeland Security; new text end new text begin (5) a motor vehicle or motor vehicle equipment regulated under a federal motor vehicle safety standard, as defined in United States Code, title 49, section 30102(a)(10), and any other motor vehicle, including an off-highway vehicle or a specialty motor vehicle, such as an all-terrain vehicle, a side-by-side vehicle, farm equipment, or a personal assistive mobility device; new text end new text begin (6) a watercraft, an aircraft, a lighter-than-air aircraft, or a seaplane; new text end new text begin (7) a semiconductor, including semiconductors incorporated in electronic equipment, and materials used in the manufacture of semiconductors; new text end new text begin (8) nonconsumer electronics and nonconsumer laboratory equipment not ordinarily used for personal, family, or household purposes; new text end new text begin (9) a product that contains intentionally added PFAS with uses that are currently listed as acceptable, acceptable subject to use conditions, or acceptable subject to narrowed use limits in the United States Environmental Protection Agency's rules under the Significant New Alternatives Policy Program if the product contains PFAS that are being used as substitutes for ozone-depleting substances under the conditions specified in the federal rules; new text end new text begin (10) a product used for generating, distributing, or storing electricity; new text end new text begin (11) a product that contains fluoropolymers consisting of polymeric substances for which the backbone of the polymer is either a perfluorinated or polyfluorinated carbon-only backbone or a perfluorinated polyether backbone and that are solid at standard temperature and pressure; new text end new text begin (12) a product that contains intentionally added PFAS in electronic components or internal components and enclosures of such components; new text end new text begin (13) a manufactured good composed of 100 or more manufactured components with an intended useful life of five or more years when the product is typically not consumed, destroyed, or discarded after a single use; new text end new text begin (14) an electronic or mechanical device composed of multiple manufactured components with an intended useful life of three or more years when the product is typically not consumed, destroyed, or discarded after a single use and the components of which would be impracticable to redesign or replace; new text end new text begin (15) a product component of an item described in clause (13) or (14); and new text end new text begin (16) equipment, parts, components, or materials directly used in the manufacture, development, servicing, or maintenance of the products described in clauses (1) to (15). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end